Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2026
2-1091.02

Fees; department; powers.

(1) Fees under the Plant Protection and Plant Pest Act that are due on January
1, 2027, shall be the amount in column A of subsection (3) of this
section.

(2) The license fees due January 1, 2028, and each January 1 thereafter shall
be set by the director on or before July 1 of each year. The director may raise
or lower such fees each year to meet the criteria in this subsection, but the
fee shall not be greater than the amount in column B of subsection (3) of this
section. The same percentage shall be applied to each category for all fee
increases or decreases. The director shall use the fees in column A of
subsection (3) of this section as a base for future fee increases or decreases.
The director shall determine the fees based on estimated annual revenue and
fiscal year-end cash fund balances as follows:

(a) The estimated annual revenue shall not be greater than one hundred seven
percent of program cash fund appropriations allocated for the Plant Protection
and Plant Pest Act; and

(b) The estimated fiscal year-end cash fund balance shall not be greater than
seventeen percent of program cash fund appropriations allocated for the
act.

(3) Fees.

Fees
A
B

Nursery stock

distributor license

as set forth in

section 2-1091.01

for the first acre
$140
$180

Fee for additional acres
$39 per acre
$50 per acre

Inspection fees due

under section
$39 per hour
$50 per hour

2-1091 or 2-1095
$0.70 per mile
$1.00 per mile

Phytosanitary or

export certificates

set forth in section 2-1091
$60 per certificate
$106 per certificate

European corn borer

quarantine certification

license set forth in
$65 per license,
$80 per license,

section 2-1091
annually
annually

European corn borer
$25 for
$35 for

certificate
packet of 25
packet of 25

Quarantine compliance

agreements as set
$65 per agreement,
$80 per agreement,

forth in section 2-1091
annually
annually

(4) A person that is distributing without first obtaining a nursery stock
distributor license shall pay an additional fee of twenty-five percent of the
license fee that is due for each month that such person failed to obtain such
license.

(5) Any fee remaining unpaid for more than one month shall be considered
delinquent and the person owing the fee shall pay an additional administrative
fee of twenty-five percent of the delinquent amount for each month it remains
unpaid, not to exceed one hundred percent of the original amount due. The
department may waive the additional administrative fee based upon the existence
and extent of any mitigating circumstances that have resulted in the late
payment of such fee. The purpose of the additional administrative fee is to
cover the administrative costs associated with collecting fees, and all money
collected as an additional administrative fee shall be remitted to the State
Treasurer for credit to the Plant Protection and Plant Pest Cash Fund.

Laws 2013, LB68, § 11;

Laws 2026, LB948, § 3.

March 17, 2026